Maryland, session 2026, SB0252.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Human Services
11–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Board” means the Board of Directors of the Maryland Legal Services
Corporation.
(c) “Corporation” means the Maryland Legal Services Corporation.
11–301.
(a) There is a Board of Directors of the Corporation.
(b) (1) The Board consists of:
(i) [nine] 12 voting members appointed by the Governor with the
advice and consent of the Senate; and
– 1 –

Ch. 660 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ii) the executive director, who is a nonvoting ex officio member.
(2) Voting members shall be residents of the State and shall represent the
different geographical regions of the State.
(3) [Five] SEVEN voting members shall be lawyers admitted to the Bar in
the State and [four] FIVE voting members shall be nonlawyers.
(c) A voting member of the Board is not an officer or employee of the State.
(d) (1) The term of office of a voting member is 3 years.
(2) At the end of a term a voting member continues to serve until a
successor is appointed and qualifies.
(3) The terms of voting members are staggered as required by the terms
provided for members of the Board on October 1, 2007.
(4) If a vacancy occurs during the term of a voting member, the Governor
shall fill the vacancy.
(5) A voting member who is appointed after a term has begun serves only
for the rest of the term and until a successor is appointed and qualifies.
(6) A voting member may not be reappointed for more than 2 consecutive
terms immediately following the member’s initial term.
(e) (1) A voting member may be removed by a vote of [seven] NINE members.
(2) A voting member may only be removed for:
(i) malfeasance in office;
(ii) persistent neglect of or inability to discharge duties; or
(iii) offenses involving moral turpitude.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 26, 2026.
– 2 –